bg-BG: Дейност с щангата с тежести: Смесена употреба; Силов трибой; Специална; Обучение по техника; Вдигане на тежести; Други
hr-HR: Aktivnost za upotrebu šipke s utezima: Mješovita namjena; Powerlifting; Specijalizirana; Vježbanje tehnike; Dizanje utega; Ostalo
it: Utilizzo del bilanciere: Uso misto; Powerlifting; Specialità; Allenamento tecnico; Sollevamento pesi; Altro
de: Hantelstangenaktivität: Mischnutzung; Powerlifting; Speziell; Techniktraining; Gewichtheben; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Destinația barei pentru haltere: Utilizare mixtă; Powerlifting; Specialitate; Antrenament tehnic; Haltere; Altele
ru: Вид работы с грифом штанги: Многофункциональная; Пауэрлифтинг; Специальная; Обучение технике; Тяжелая атлетика; Другая
zh-CN: 举重杆活动: 混合使用; 力举; 特种; 技术培训; 举重; 其他
sv: Viktstångsaktivitet: Blandad användning; Styrkelyft; Specialitet; Teknikträning; Tyngdlyftning; Övrigt
ko: 웨이트 바 활용: 혼합 사용; 파워리프팅; 특수; 기술 훈련; 역도; 기타
th: กิจกรรมบาร์น้ำหนัก: ใช้งานแบบผสม; พาวเวอร์ลิฟติง; เฉพาะทาง; การฝึกเทคนิค; ยกน้ำหนัก; อื่นๆ
pl: Ćwiczenie ze sztangą: Do różnego użytku; Trójbój siłowy; Specjalizacja; Szkolenie techniczne; Podnoszenie ciężarów; Inne
fr: Activité de barre de poids: Usage mixte; Haltérophilie; Spécialité; Entraînement technique; Musculation; Autre
zh-TW: 舉重桿活動: 混合使用; 力量舉重; 專業; 技術訓練; 舉重; 其他
cs: Činnost pro činkovou tyč: Smíšené použití; Silový trojboj; Speciální; Školení techniky; Vzpírání; Jiné
pt-BR: Atividade com barra de peso: Uso misto; Powerlifting; Halter especial; Treinamento com técnica; Levantamento de peso; Outro
nb: Vektstangaktivitet: Blandet bruk; Styrkeløft; Spesialitet; Teknikktrening; Vektløfting; Annet
nl: Halterstangactiviteit: Gemengd gebruik; Powerlifting; Specialiteit; Techniektraining; Gewichtheffen; Andere
en: Weight bar activity: Mixed use; Powerlifting; Specialty; Technique training; Weightlifting; Other
ja: バーベル運動: 複合トレーニング; パワーリフティング; 特化; テクニックトレーニング; ウェイトリフティング; その他
pt-PT: Atividade da barra de peso: Uso misto; Halterofilismo; Especialidade; Treino técnico; Levantamento de peso; Outro
sk-SK: Použitie vzpieračských tyčí: Zmiešané použitie; Silový trojboj; Špecialita; Nácvik techniky; Vzpieranie; Iné
da: Vægtstangsaktivitet: Blandet brug; Styrkeløft; Specialitet; Tekniktræning; Vægtløft; Andet
es: Actividad de la barra de pesas: Uso mixto; Levantamiento de pesas; Especialidad; Entrenamiento de técnica; Levantamiento de pesas; Otros
fi: Painotangon toiminta: Sekakäyttöön; Powerlifting; Erityinen; Tekniikan treenaus; Painonnosto; Muu
tr: Ağırlık Barı Etkinliği: Karışık kullanım; Powerlift; Özel; Teknik antrenman; Ağırlık kaldırma; Diğer
hu: Súlyzós edzés: Vegyes használat; Erőemelés; Különlegesség; Technikaképzés; Súlyemelés; Egyéb
sl-SI: Dejavnost palice z utežmi: Mešana uporaba; Powerlifting; Posebnost; Trening tehnike; Dvigovanje uteži; Drugo
lt-LT: Grifo paskirtis: Mišrus naudojimas; Svorių kilnojimas; Specializuotas; Technikos mokymas; Sunkioji atletika; Kita
vi: Hoạt động của thanh tạ: Sử dụng hỗn hợp; Lực tạ; Chuyên dụng; Đào tạo kỹ thuật; Cử tạ; Khác
el: Δραστηριότητα με μπάρες άρσης βαρών: Μικτή χρήση; Powerlifting; Ειδικό; Εκπαίδευση τεχνικής; Άρση βαρών; Άλλο